New York, session 2025-2026, S3959.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 70 of the judiciary law, as amended by chapter 690 2 of the laws of 2007, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 70. Judicial departments. The state is hereby divided into four 4 judicial departments. The first department shall consist of the counties 5 embraced within the first and twelfth judicial districts; the second 6 department shall consist of the counties embraced within the second, 7 ninth, tenth, eleventh and thirteenth judicial districts; the third 8 department shall consist of the counties embraced within the third, 9 fourth and sixth judicial districts; the fourth department shall consist 10 of the counties embraced within the fifth, seventh [and], eighth and 11 fourteenth judicial districts. 12 § 2. The opening paragraph and the seventh undesignated paragraph of 13 section 140 of the judiciary law, the opening paragraph as amended by 14 chapter 690 of the laws of 2007 and the seventh undesignated paragraph 15 as amended by chapter 10 of the laws of 1948, are amended and a new 16 fourteenth undesignated paragraph is added to read as follows: 17 The state is hereby divided into [thirteen] fourteen judicial 18 districts, pursuant to the provisions of the first section of the sixth 19 article of the constitution, which districts shall be arranged as 20 follows: 21 The seventh judicial district shall consist of the counties of Living- 22 ston, Wayne, Seneca, Yates, Ontario, Steuben[, Monroe] and Cayuga; 23 The fourteenth judicial district shall consist of the county of 24 Monroe. The creation of such fourteenth judicial district shall not 25 affect or impair the rights, privileges or compensation of any officer EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05444-01-5 S. 3959 2 1 or employee of the supreme court in office on the first day of January, 2 two thousand twenty-six in the seventh judicial district as theretofore 3 constituted; each such officer or employee employed in the county of 4 Monroe on such date shall thereafter be an officer or employee for the 5 fourteenth judicial district and each such officer or employee employed 6 in the counties of Livingston, Wayne, Seneca, Yates, Ontario, Steuben 7 and Cayuga on such date shall thereafter be an officer or employee for 8 the seventh judicial district. 9 § 3. Subdivisions 7 and 13 of section 140-a of the judicial law, as 10 amended by chapter 749 of the laws of 2023, are amended and a new subdi- 11 vision 14 is added to read as follows: 12 7. Seventh district, [twenty] six; 13 13. Thirteenth district, nine[.]; and 14 14. Fourteenth district, fourteen. 15 § 4. The county of Monroe shall establish, maintain and expand, if 16 necessary, its court library, as established in accordance with sections 17 813 and 814 of the judiciary law, to accommodate the needs of the four- 18 teenth judicial district. 19 § 5. The following named justices or their successors in office on the 20 effective date of this act shall for the remainder of the terms for 21 which they were elected or appointed be justices of the supreme court in 22 and for the seventh judicial district as reconstituted and continued by 23 this act. 24 Elena F. Cariola 25 Jason Cook 26 Craig J. Doran 27 William K. Taylor 28 James A. Vazzana 29 Joseph D. Waldorf 30 The following named justices or their successors in office on the 31 effective date of this act shall for the remainder of the terms for 32 which they were elected or appointed be justices of the supreme court in 33 and for the fourteenth judicial district as created and constituted by 34 this act. 35 Victoria M. Argento 36 Vincent M. Dinolfo 37 Gail A. Donofrio 38 Daniel J. Doyle 39 John B. Gallagher, Jr. 40 Steven K. Lindley 41 Kevin M. Nasca 42 Alex R. Renzi 43 Stacey M. Romeo 44 Judith A. Sinclair 45 Charles A. Schiano, Jr. 46 Erin Skinner 47 Sam L. Valleriani 48 James W. Walsh 49 § 6. It is the intended object of this act to erect, in the fourth 50 judicial department, the fourteenth judicial district, comprised of the 51 county of Monroe and to provide for the employees thereof selection, 52 designation, nomination and election in the general election to be held 53 in November, 2026 of justices of the seventh and fourteenth judicial 54 districts consistent with the foregoing provisions of this act. Any 55 other consistent provision of law, rule or regulation which by its terms 56 or in its application aids in the accomplishment of such object shall be S. 3959 3 1 given full force and effect. Any provision which is inconsistent with 2 the accomplishment of such object shall be denied force and effect to 3 the extent that it may be applicable thereto. 4 § 7. If any provisions of any section of this act shall be held void 5 or unconstitutional, all other provisions and all other sections of this 6 act which are not expressly held to be void or unconstitutional shall 7 continue in full force and effect. 8 § 8. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 9 sections one through five of this act shall take effect January 1, 2027.